Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
MENTAL HEALTH AND INTELLECTUAL

DISABILITY
STUDIES

Note

Part heading amended by L 2011, c 220, §1.

§324-11 Sources of information protected.
Any person, public or private medical facility, or social or educational
agency, may provide information, interviews, reports, statements, memoranda, or
other data or relevant material relating to individuals to the department of
health to be used in the course of any study for the purpose of reducing
morbidity or mortality resulting from mental illness or intellectual disability.

No liability of any kind or character for
damages or other relief shall arise or be enforced against any person or
organization by reason of having provided the information or material, or by
reason of having released or published the findings, conclusions, and summaries
of the research or study committees to advance medical research and medical
education. [L 1964, c 13, §2; Supp, §48B-11; HRS §324-11; am L 2011, c 220, §12]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next